Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-507
Foreign and domestic companies; policies; contents; reciprocity.

The policies of any insurance company not organized under the laws of this state may, if filed with the director pursuant to the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act, contain any provisions which the law of the state, territory, district, or country under which the company is organized prescribes shall be in such policies when issued in this state, and the policies of any insurance company organized under the laws of this state may, when issued or delivered in any other state, territory, district, or country, contain any provision required by the laws of the state, territory, district, or country in which such policies are issued, the provisions of sections 44-501 to 44-510 to the contrary notwithstanding.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 106, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 3243;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. VII, § 7, p. 634;

C.S.1922, § 7842;

Laws 1925, c. 124, § 4, p. 330;

C.S.1929, § 44-607;

R.S.1943, § 44-507;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 5.

Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act, see section 44-7501.